test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3nensg-ade_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - 3nen_sgade: #  sg ade -- inte kontrollerad 
    uutinen+N+Sg+Ade: uutisella
    uutinen+N+Sg+Ade: uutisellä
    lipponen+N+Sg+Ade: lipposella
    lipponen+N+Sg+Ade: lipposellä
    pahanen+N+Sg+Ade: pahasella
    ukkopahanen+N+Sg+Ade: ukkopahasella
    tulivihanen+N+Sg+Ade: tulivihasella
    tuhanen+N+Sg+Ade: tuhasella
    kruunutuhanen+N+Sg+Ade: kruunutuhasella
    tianen+N+Sg+Ade: tiasella
    keltatianen+N+Sg+Ade: keltatiasella
    talitianen+N+Sg+Ade: talitiasella
    pohjasentianen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjasentiasella
    pohjastianen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjastiasella
    pakkastianen+N+Sg+Ade: pakkastiasella
    kuhutianen+N+Sg+Ade: kuhutiasella
    tiukutianen+N+Sg+Ade: tiukutiasella
    mökkötianen+N+Sg+Ade: mökkötiasella
    vyötianen+N+Sg+Ade: vyötiasella
    pohjanen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjasella
    rautapohjanen+N+Sg+Ade: rautapohjasella
    kuostepohjanen+N+Sg+Ade: kuostepohjasella
    kolmipohjanen+N+Sg+Ade: kolmipohjasella
    länsipohjanen+N+Sg+Ade: länsipohjasella
    korinpohjanen+N+Sg+Ade: korinpohjasella
    kakspohjanen+N+Sg+Ade: kakspohjasella
    kakssoutunen+N+Sg+Ade: kakssoutusella
    kaksvartinen+N+Sg+Ade: kaksvartisella
    kangassininen+N+Sg+Ade: kangassinisella
    kangonen+N+Sg+Ade: kangosella
    kansakäyminen+N+Sg+Ade: kansakäymisellä
    kansinen+N+Sg+Ade: kansisella
    kantanen+N+Sg+Ade: kantasella
    karkuhevonen+N+Sg+Ade: karkuhevosella
    karvanen+N+Sg+Ade: karvasella
    katnanen+N+Sg+Ade: katnasella
    kaukanen+N+Sg+Ade: kaukasella
    kauppahevonen+N+Sg+Ade: kauppahevosella
    kaurahevonen+N+Sg+Ade: kaurahevosella
    kehnokuulonen+N+Sg+Ade: kehnokuulosella
    kellohevonen+N+Sg+Ade: kellohevosella
    keltanen+N+Sg+Ade: keltasella
    keltatianen+N+Sg+Ade: keltatiasella
    keltavästinen+N+Sg+Ade: keltavästisellä
    kenkähevonen+N+Sg+Ade: kenkähevosella
    kenkänen+N+Sg+Ade: kenkäsellä
    kertanen+N+Sg+Ade: kertasella
    keränalanen+N+Sg+Ade: keränalasella
    keskenaikanen+N+Sg+Ade: keskenaikasella
    keskisininen+N+Sg+Ade: keskisinisellä
    keskonen+N+Sg+Ade: keskosella
    keskunen+N+Sg+Ade: keskusella
    kesähevonen+N+Sg+Ade: kesähevosella
    kevähevonen+N+Sg+Ade: kevähevosella
    kiehinen+N+Sg+Ade: kiehisellä
    kielinen+N+Sg+Ade: kielisellä
    kiimanen+N+Sg+Ade: kiimasella
    kiljuvapakkanen+N+Sg+Ade: kiljuvapakkasella
    kilkuvapakkanen+N+Sg+Ade: kilkuvapakkasella
    kirsikoskunen+N+Sg+Ade: kirsikoskusella
    kirvespohjapakkanen+N+Sg+Ade: kirvespohjapakkasella
    kiukhainen+N+Sg+Ade: kiukhaisella
    kivunalhainen+N+Sg+Ade: kivunalhaisella
    klasipalanen+N+Sg+Ade: klasipalasella
    kliitupalanen+N+Sg+Ade: kliitupalasella
    kläppimaranen+N+Sg+Ade: kläppimarasella
    kläppönen+N+Sg+Ade: kläppösellä
    koijunen+N+Sg+Ade: koijusella
    koipörhönen+N+Sg+Ade: koipörhösellä
    koiranen+N+Sg+Ade: koirasella
    koirashakanen+N+Sg+Ade: koirashakasella
    kolmastalvinen+N+Sg+Ade: kolmastalvisella
    kolmipohjanen+N+Sg+Ade: kolmipohjasella
    kolmonen+N+Sg+Ade: kolmosella
    kolttonen+N+Sg+Ade: kolttosella
    koppaviitonen+N+Sg+Ade: koppaviitosella
    korinpohjanen+N+Sg+Ade: korinpohjasella
    korkeamaitonen+N+Sg+Ade: korkeamaitosella
    korvanen+N+Sg+Ade: korvasella
    koskunen+N+Sg+Ade: koskusella
    koti-ihminen+N+Sg+Ade: koti-ihmisellä
    kotipääskynen+N+Sg+Ade: kotipääskysellä
    kotunen+N+Sg+Ade: kotusella
    kouranen+N+Sg+Ade: kourasella
    tasanen+N+Sg+Ade: tasasella
    parempiosanen+N+Sg+Ade: parempiosasella
    mieskohtanen+N+Sg+Ade: mieskohtasella
    keltanen+N+Sg+Ade: keltasella
    keltanen+N+Sg+Ade: keltasella
    punakeltanen+N+Sg+Ade: punakeltasella
    munankeltanen+N+Sg+Ade: munankeltasella
    iltanen+N+Sg+Ade: iltasella
    kultanen+N+Sg+Ade: kultasella
    kantanen+N+Sg+Ade: kantasella
    kuivakantanen+N+Sg+Ade: kuivakantasella
    mustasontanen+N+Sg+Ade: mustasontasella
    kertanen+N+Sg+Ade: kertasella
    vastanen+N+Sg+Ade: vastasella
    lauttanen+N+Sg+Ade: lauttasella
    hautanen+N+Sg+Ade: hautasella
    miekkalautanen+N+Sg+Ade: miekkalautasella
    voilautanen+N+Sg+Ade: voilautasella
    vaivanen+N+Sg+Ade: vaivasella
    mielivaivanen+N+Sg+Ade: mielivaivasella
    rovanen+N+Sg+Ade: rovasella
    karvanen+N+Sg+Ade: karvasella
    korvanen+N+Sg+Ade: korvasella
    paksukorvanen+N+Sg+Ade: paksukorvasella
    kymmenen+N+Sg+Ade: kymmesellä
    vuosikymmenen+N+Sg+Ade: vuosikymmesellä
    munhainen+N+Sg+Ade: munhaisella
    pinnantakhainen+N+Sg+Ade: pinnantakhaisella
    mettäntakhainen+N+Sg+Ade: mettäntakhaisella
    puoliaikhainen+N+Sg+Ade: puoliaikhaisella
    kiukhainen+N+Sg+Ade: kiukhaisella
    joukhainen+N+Sg+Ade: joukhaisella
    kuukhainen+N+Sg+Ade: kuukhaisella
    kivunalhainen+N+Sg+Ade: kivunalhaisella
    kulhainen+N+Sg+Ade: kulhaisella
    kulkunen+N+Sg+Ade: kulkusella
    kultanen+N+Sg+Ade: kultasella
    kuomanen+N+Sg+Ade: kuomasella
    kuomunen+N+Sg+Ade: kuomusella
    kuoppanen+N+Sg+Ade: kuoppasella
    kuormahevonen+N+Sg+Ade: kuormahevosella
    kuormhainen+N+Sg+Ade: kuormhaisella
    kuostekoilinen+N+Sg+Ade: kuostekoilisella
    kuostepohjanen+N+Sg+Ade: kuostepohjasella
    kurmukärpänen+N+Sg+Ade: kurmukärpäsellä
    kurmuperhonen+N+Sg+Ade: kurmuperhosella
    kutheinen+N+Sg+Ade: kutheisella
    kuuhainen+N+Sg+Ade: kuuhaisella
    makkaratiainen+N+Sg+Ade: makkaratiaisella
    tiitiainen+N+Sg+Ade: tiitiaisella
    päkstiitiainen+N+Sg+Ade: päkstiitiaisella
    pohjasentiainen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjasentiaisella
    muuhrainen+N+Sg+Ade: muuhraisella
    jänkkämuuhrainen+N+Sg+Ade: jänkkämuuhraisella
    muurainen+N+Sg+Ade: muuraisella
    lakheinen+N+Sg+Ade: lakheisella
    lakheinen+N+Sg+Ade: lakheisella
    likheinen+N+Sg+Ade: likheisellä
    tiukheinen+N+Sg+Ade: tiukheisella
    äärheinen+N+Sg+Ade: äärheisellä
    vaatheinen+N+Sg+Ade: vaatheisella
    kutheinen+N+Sg+Ade: kutheisella
    kiehinen+N+Sg+Ade: kiehisellä
    miehinen+N+Sg+Ade: miehisellä
    pilhinen+N+Sg+Ade: pilhisellä
    vuoohinen+N+Sg+Ade: vuoohisella
    uuhinen+N+Sg+Ade: uuhisella
    lokkinen+N+Sg+Ade: lokkisella
    mökkinen+N+Sg+Ade: mökkisellä
    naimahenkinen+N+Sg+Ade: naimahenkisella
    leskinen+N+Sg+Ade: leskisellä
    hetkinen+N+Sg+Ade: hetkisellä
    trykinen+N+Sg+Ade: trykisellä
    väkinen+N+Sg+Ade: väkisellä
    vähäväkinen+N+Sg+Ade: vähäväkisellä
    paalinen+N+Sg+Ade: paalisella
    kielinen+N+Sg+Ade: kielisellä
    kielinen+N+Sg+Ade: kielisellä
    -kielinen+N+Sg+Ade: -kielisellä
    latinankielinen+N+Sg+Ade: latinankielisella
    toiskielinen+N+Sg+Ade: toiskielisella
    mielinen+N+Sg+Ade: mielisellä
    kahamielinen+N+Sg+Ade: kahamielisella
    velinen+N+Sg+Ade: velisellä
    eilinen+N+Sg+Ade: eilisellä
    kuostekoilinen+N+Sg+Ade: kuostekoilisella
    lusikallinen+N+Sg+Ade: lusikallisella
    vellinen+N+Sg+Ade: vellisellä
    lauvantaillinen+N+Sg+Ade: lauvantaillisella
    niskampäällinen+N+Sg+Ade: niskampäällisellä
    ylinen+N+Sg+Ade: ylisellä
    paijanylinen+N+Sg+Ade: paijanylisellä
    fiilipäälinen+N+Sg+Ade: fiilipäälisellä
    niskampäälinen+N+Sg+Ade: niskampäälisellä
    maanpäälinen+N+Sg+Ade: maanpäälisellä
    maijonpäälinen+N+Sg+Ade: maijonpäälisellä
    ihminen+N+Sg+Ade: ihmisellä
    villi-ihminen+N+Sg+Ade: villi-ihmisellä
    koti-ihminen+N+Sg+Ade: koti-ihmisellä
    outaihminen+N+Sg+Ade: outaihmisella
    kranninihminen+N+Sg+Ade: kranninihmisella
    lapinihminen+N+Sg+Ade: lapinihmisella
    vaimoihminen+N+Sg+Ade: vaimoihmisella
    vieroihminen+N+Sg+Ade: vieroihmisella
    tyärihminen+N+Sg+Ade: tyärihmisellä
    miesihminen+N+Sg+Ade: miesihmisellä
    ympäristöihminen+N+Sg+Ade: ympäristöihmisellä
    naiminen+N+Sg+Ade: naimisella
    väkiriipiminen+N+Sg+Ade: väkiriipimisellä
    leherriipiminen+N+Sg+Ade: leherriipimisellä
    potukkuoriminen+N+Sg+Ade: potukkuorimisella
    puiminen+N+Sg+Ade: puimisella
    ylihuominen+N+Sg+Ade: ylihuomisella
    tuominen+N+Sg+Ade: tuomisella
    kansakäyminen+N+Sg+Ade: kansakäymisellä
    myötenkäyminen+N+Sg+Ade: myötenkäymisellä
    myötäkäyminen+N+Sg+Ade: myötäkäymisellä
    keskisininen+N+Sg+Ade: keskisinisellä
    kangassininen+N+Sg+Ade: kangassinisella
    öljysininen+N+Sg+Ade: öljysinisellä
    pohjoinen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjoisella
    pienoinen+N+Sg+Ade: pienoisella
    puolipitoinen+N+Sg+Ade: puolipitoisella
    umpinen+N+Sg+Ade: umpisella
    loppinen+N+Sg+Ade: loppisella
    viisloppinen+N+Sg+Ade: viisloppisella
    kaksparinen+N+Sg+Ade: kaksparisella
    verinen+N+Sg+Ade: verisellä
    punaverinen+N+Sg+Ade: punaverisella
    viisäyrinen+N+Sg+Ade: viisäyrisellä
    yksinen+N+Sg+Ade: yksisellä
    kansinen+N+Sg+Ade: kansisella
    lapsinen+N+Sg+Ade: lapsisella
    vetinen+N+Sg+Ade: vetisellä
    lehtinen+N+Sg+Ade: lehtisellä
    tiitinen+N+Sg+Ade: tiitisellä
    entinen+N+Sg+Ade: entisellä
    totinen+N+Sg+Ade: totisella
    kaksvartinen+N+Sg+Ade: kaksvartisella
    keltavästinen+N+Sg+Ade: keltavästisellä
    toukomettinen+N+Sg+Ade: toukomettisella
    neliskanttinen+N+Sg+Ade: neliskanttisella
    nenähuokonen+N+Sg+Ade: nenähuokosella
    niskampäälinen+N+Sg+Ade: niskampäälisellä
    niskampäällinen+N+Sg+Ade: niskampäällisellä
    niskanen+N+Sg+Ade: niskasella
    nokkanen+N+Sg+Ade: nokkasella
    norvonen+N+Sg+Ade: norvosella
    nurkantakanen+N+Sg+Ade: nurkantakasella
    ohranen+N+Sg+Ade: ohrasella
    omakätinen+N+Sg+Ade: omakätisellä
    onnennäkönen+N+Sg+Ade: onnennäkösellä
    orihevonen+N+Sg+Ade: orihevosella
    outaihminen+N+Sg+Ade: outaihmisella
    outosananen+N+Sg+Ade: outosanasella
    paalinen+N+Sg+Ade: paalisella
    pahanen+N+Sg+Ade: pahasella
    paijanalanen+N+Sg+Ade: paijanalasella
    paijanylinen+N+Sg+Ade: paijanylisellä
    painhainen+N+Sg+Ade: painhaisella
    pakkanen+N+Sg+Ade: pakkasella
    pakkastianen+N+Sg+Ade: pakkastiasella
    paksukorvanen+N+Sg+Ade: paksukorvasella
    palanen+N+Sg+Ade: palasella
    papunen+N+Sg+Ade: papusella
    parempiosanen+N+Sg+Ade: parempiosasella
    paskakärpänen+N+Sg+Ade: paskakärpäsellä
    paskaryyppönen+N+Sg+Ade: paskaryyppösellä
    paskaröttinen+N+Sg+Ade: paskaröttisellä
    uutinen+N+Sg+Ade: uutisella
    uutinen+N+Sg+Ade: uutisellä
    omakätinen+N+Sg+Ade: omakätisellä
    kaksnieluinen+N+Sg+Ade: kaksnieluisella
    paunuinen+N+Sg+Ade: paunuisella
    kolmastalvinen+N+Sg+Ade: kolmastalvisella
    järvinen+N+Sg+Ade: järvisellä
    lehmäkkytkyinen+N+Sg+Ade: lehmäkkytkyisellä
    muistoikhäinen+N+Sg+Ade: muistoikhäisellä
    perhäinen+N+Sg+Ade: perhäisellä
    viljaperhäinen+N+Sg+Ade: viljaperhäisellä
    väliperhäinen+N+Sg+Ade: väliperhäisellä
    lehmäpperhäinen+N+Sg+Ade: lehmäpperhäisellä
    viisseinäinen+N+Sg+Ade: viisseinäisellä
    pörhöinen+N+Sg+Ade: pörhöisellä
    vesipörhöinen+N+Sg+Ade: vesipörhöisellä
    kangonen+N+Sg+Ade: kangosella
    kurmuperhonen+N+Sg+Ade: kurmuperhosella
    pionen+N+Sg+Ade: piosella
    pohjonen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjosella
    liekonen+N+Sg+Ade: liekosella
    kakkonen+N+Sg+Ade: kakkosella
    miekkonen+N+Sg+Ade: miekkosella
    veikkonen+N+Sg+Ade: veikkosella
    mokkonen+N+Sg+Ade: mokkosella
    ukkonen+N+Sg+Ade: ukkosella
    jalkonen+N+Sg+Ade: jalkosella
    munanvalkonen+N+Sg+Ade: munanvalkosella
    nenähuokonen+N+Sg+Ade: nenähuokosella
    keskonen+N+Sg+Ade: keskosella
    taikauskonen+N+Sg+Ade: taikauskosella
    vääräuskonen+N+Sg+Ade: vääräuskosella
    kehnokuulonen+N+Sg+Ade: kehnokuulosella
    kolmonen+N+Sg+Ade: kolmosella
    täyshermonen+N+Sg+Ade: täyshermosella
    peiponen+N+Sg+Ade: peiposella
    peipponen+N+Sg+Ade: peipposella
    lipponen+N+Sg+Ade: lipposella
    lipponen+N+Sg+Ade: lipposellä
    vaaronen+N+Sg+Ade: vaarosella
    pikkuveronen+N+Sg+Ade: pikkuverosella
    pilhinen+N+Sg+Ade: pilhisellä
    pilkkapääskynen+N+Sg+Ade: pilkkapääskysellä
    pilvipakkanen+N+Sg+Ade: pilvipakkasella
    pinnantakhainen+N+Sg+Ade: pinnantakhaisella
    pionen+N+Sg+Ade: piosella
    piskanen+N+Sg+Ade: piskasella
    pitkänen+N+Sg+Ade: pitkäsellä
    plittunokkanen+N+Sg+Ade: plittunokkasella
    pohjanen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjasella
    pohjasentiainen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjasentiaisella
    pohjasentianen+N+Sg+Ade: pohjasentiasella
